Hawaii statutes.
§171-38 Condemnation of leases. The
lease shall provide that whenever a portion of the public land under lease is
condemned for public purposes by the State, or any county or city and county,
or any other governmental agency or subdivision, the rental shall be reduced in
proportion to the value of the portion of the premises condemned, and the
lessee shall be entitled to receive from the condemning authority the:

(1) Value of growing crops, if any, that the lessee
is not permitted to harvest; and

(2) Proportionate value of the lessee's permanent
improvements taken in the proportion that it bears to the unexpired term of the
lease.

The lessee, in the alternative, may remove and
relocate the lessee's improvements to the remainder of the lands occupied by the
lessee. The foregoing rights of the lessee shall not be exclusive of any other
to which the lessee may be entitled by law, including those rights established
in section 171-37.5. Where the portion taken renders the remainder unsuitable
for the uses for which the land was leased, the lessee shall have the option to
surrender the lessee's lease and be discharged for any further liability
therefor; provided that the lessee may remove the lessee's permanent
improvements within a reasonable period allowed by the board. [L 1962, c 32, pt
of §2; Supp, §103A-38; HRS §171-38; gen ch 1985; am L 2013, c 234, §4]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next